District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1503

Bond; powers and duties

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 3, 34 DCR 632

History

Presumption of capacity, see § 21-2203.

Cross References

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1501 to 21-1507.

Prior Codifications